North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-11 Regulation of Wholesale Potato Dealers [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11]

4-11-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-02.
Wholesale potato dealer license required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-03.
Application for license — Contents. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-04.
Form of security to accompany application for license. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-04.1.
Termination of bond — Notice to commissioner. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-05.
Issuance of license. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 56, § 26.

4-11-06.
License — Fee — Expiration. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-07.
License — Posting. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-08.
Refusal, cancellation, or suspension of license — Grounds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-09.
Agent of licensee — Ineligibility. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-10.
Identification cards required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 58, § 8.

4-11-11.
Licensee to file schedule of commissions and charges. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 56, § 26.

4-11-12.
Accounts and records. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-13.
Discontinuation of business — Duty of dealer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-14.
Bonds — Additional required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-15.
Damage claims — Hearing — Procedure. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-15.1.
Recovery of trust fund — Report — Notice to claimants. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-15.2.
Representation of commissioner by attorney general. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-16.
Inspection of potatoes — Right to demand — Certificate of inspection. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-17.
Consignee of potatoes to make report. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-18.
Sales reports unsatisfactory — Remedy of shipper. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-19.
Rules. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-20.
Investigation — Hearing — Action on license. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-21.
Fees and collections — Revolving fund — Appropriation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-22.
Enforcement of chapter. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-23.
Violations of chapter defined — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-11-24.
Cooperation with governmental agencies. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.